Utah statutes.
48-1d-1045.   Statement of conversion.

(1)  A statement of conversion must be signed by the converting entity and delivered to the division for filing.

(2)  A statement of conversion must contain:

(a)  the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converting entity;

(b)  the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

(c)  if the converting entity is a domestic entity, a statement that the plan of conversion was approved in accordance with Sections 48-1d-1041 through 48-1d-1046 or, if the converting entity is a foreign entity, a statement that the conversion was approved by the foreign converting entity in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

(d)  if the converted entity is a domestic filing entity, the text of its public organic record, as an attachment;

(e)  if the converted entity is a domestic limited liability partnership, the text of its statement of qualification, as an attachment; and

(f)  if the converted entity is a foreign entity that is not a registered foreign entity, a mailing address to which the division may send any process served on the division pursuant to Subsection 48-1d-1046(5).

(3)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (2), a statement of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

(4)  If the converted entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, except that the public organic record does not need to be signed.

(5)  A plan of conversion that is signed by a domestic converting entity and meets all the requirements of Subsection (2) may be delivered to the division for filing instead of a statement of conversion and on filing has the same effect.  If a plan of conversion is filed as provided in this Subsection (5), references in this part to a statement of conversion refer to the plan of conversion filed under this Subsection (5).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

